src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kueqrnec_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueʹrnec e-stem kamari: # Noun "kamari" - full paradigm
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Nom: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Acc: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Ill: kueʹrnca
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Loc: kueʹrncest
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Com: kueʹrncin
     kueʹrnec+N+Ess: kueʹrncen
     kueʹrnec+N+Par: kueʹrnced
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Abe: [kueʹrnectaa, kueʹrnectää]
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Nom: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Gen: kueʹrnci
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Acc: kueʹrncid
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Ill: kueʹrncid
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Loc: kueʹrncin
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Com: kueʹrncivuiʹm
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Abe: [kueʹrncitaa, kueʹrncitää]
